Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-412
Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse; created; duties; rules and regulations.

There is hereby created, as a division of the Nebraska Library Commission, a Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse. The clearinghouse shall establish and operate a publications collection and depository system for the use of Nebraska citizens. To this end, the Nebraska Library Commission shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as shall be necessary to carry out sections 51-411 to 51-418.

Laws 1972, LB 1284, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 4.